Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
482

TRADEMARKS,
SERVICE MARKS, AND TRADE NAMES,

REGISTRATION
AND PROTECTION OF

Part I. General Provisions

Section

482-1 Definitions

Part II. Trade Names

482-2 Certificate

482-3 Record, issuance and effect of certificate

482-3.5 Repealed

482-4 Certain trade names not to be adopted or
used

482-5 Repealed

482-6 Revocation of certificate; nonuse

482-7 Application of law; reissue on nonuser

482-8 Revocation of trade name registration

482-8.5 Administrative order of abatement against
a

registered or authorized entity

482-9 Appeal

482-10 to 12 Repealed

Part III. Trademarks and Service Marks

482-21 Registrability

482-22 Application for registration

482-23 Filing of applications; appeal

482-24 Certificate of registration

482-25 Duration and renewal

482-26 Assignment; change of name

482-27 Records

482-28 Cancellation

482-28.5 Revocation of a mark

482-29 Classification

482-30 Repealed

482-31 Infringement

482-32 Injury to business reputation; dilution

482-33 Remedies

482-34 Forum for actions regarding registration;
service on

out of state registrants

482-35 Repealed

482-36 Fees

482-37 Repealed

Part IV. Miscellaneous

482-51 Penalties for signing false documents

482-52 Liability for fraudulent registration

482-53 Common law rights

482-54 Severability

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 2003, c 124, §80.

Cross References

Cybersquatting, see §§481B-21 to 25.

Financial institution name fraud, see §412:2-606.5.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next